Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.030

Creation. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

The local infrastructure financing tool program is created to assist local governments in financing authorized public infrastructure projects designed to promote economic development in the jurisdiction. The local infrastructure financing tool program is not created to enable existing Washington-based businesses from outside a revenue development area to relocate into a revenue development area.

[ 2006 c 181 s 201.]